Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3813.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin GRANT PROGRAM; FIREARMS SAFETY, ARCHERY, HUNTING, AND ANGLING IN SCHOOL PHYSICAL EDUCATION COURSES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Program. new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must create a grant program to increase firearms safety, trap shooting, archery, hunting, and angling activities in physical education courses in Minnesota school districts. A school must ensure that activities funded under the program are consistent with required state standards for physical education. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) A school district or American Indian-controlled Tribal contract or grant school must apply to the commissioner of natural resources to participate in the program in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must seek geographic balance among schools selected for participation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and natural resources finance and policy. The report must be in writing and must report on activities funded by the grant program and program outcomes. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources to implement the program under this section. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Money appropriated for the program may be used for Department of Natural Resources personnel costs, curriculum development, reporting costs, school staff training, outdoor sports licenses for participating students, and equipment used in courses. new text end